Hawaii, session 2026, GM1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, according to the
American Immigration Council, the State is home to approximately
258,800 immigrants, including 29,900 undocumented immigrants.
The legislature further finds that the State is justifiably
proud of its rich immigrant heritage, which is reflected in a
valued tapestry of races, ancestral groups, religions, cultures,
and languages from many parts of the world.
The legislature further finds that the State is also proud
of its strong civil rights record. Article I, section 5, of the
Hawaii State Constitution affirmatively states that no person
shall be denied the equal protection of the laws or the
enjoyment of the person's civil rights or be discriminated
against in the exercise of these rights because of race or
ancestry.
The legislature notes that while immigration is a federal
responsibility, state and local agencies have significant
discretion regarding whether and how to respond to requests for
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO

nRiiiHiiiiaiiHiiiiiii

Page 2 1839
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
assistance from federal immigration enforcement. The
enforcement of immigration law is carried out by federal
immigration authorities, including the United States Immigration
and Customs Enforcement and United States Customs and Border
Protection, both of which are agencies of the Department of
Homeland Security. Federal law does not require state and local
entities to collect or share information with the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement and United States Customs
and Border Protection. Rather, federal law, under title 8
United States Code section 1373, limits state and local
governments from restricting communication with federal
immigration authorities concerning information regarding the
citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any
individual. There is no affirmative duty for state and local
governments to collect or share this information, and there is
no prohibition against preventing the communication of other
non-public information.
The legislature also finds that because the State is home
to residents of diverse ethnic, racial, and national
backgrounds, including immigrants who are valuable and important
members of local communities, and because of the State's strong
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO

llllllllillilllBliiH

Page 3 ■ ■ * ik ■ 1839
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
due process and civil rights protections for all, it is
essential to ensure that immigrants and migrants in state and
county law enforcement custody are provided due process and
civil rights protections.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Require state and county law enforcement agencies to
notify an individual in the custody of a state or
local law enforcement agency of their rights before
any civil immigration interview with federal
immigration authorities pertaining to certain matters
regarding civil immigration violations can commence;
and
(2) Designate all records relating to federal immigration
authorities' access to a detained individual provided
by a state or county law enforcement agency as public
records.
SECTION 2. Chapter 353C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§353C- Immigration; civil immigration interviews; due
process and transparency; requirements. (a) Before any civil
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO
■iiiiiiiiiiHiiHnn

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
immigration interview between a federal immigration authority
and an individual in law enforcement agency custody regarding
civil immigration violations may commence, the law enforcement
agency shall provide the individual with a written consent form
that; '
(1) Explains;
(A) The rights afforded under the Fifth Amendment of
the United States Constitution, including the
right to remain silent and the right to have an
attorney present if represented;
(B) The interview is voluntary; and
(C) The individual may either:
(i) Decline to be interviewed; or
(ii) Choose to be interviewed only with the
individual's attorney present; and
(2) Clearly provides a space for the individual to
indicate that they;
(A) Consent to the interview;
(B) Consent to the interview with the individual's
attorney present; or
(C) Do not consent to the interview.
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) The written consent form required under subsection (a)
shall be provided at no cost and shall be available in the
languages that the office of language access provides
translations for^ including but not limited to;
(1) Chinese Mandarin or Cantonese;
(2) Chuukese;
(3) English;
(4) Ilokano;
(5) Japanese;
(6) Korean;
(7) Olelo Hawaii;
(8) Marshallese;
(9) Samoan;
(10) Spanish;
(11) Tagalog;
(12) Thai;
(13) Vietnamese; and
(14) Visayan;
provided that other accommodations shall be made for individuals
who speak languages that the office of language access cannot
provide translation.
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO

Page 6 1839
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
The law enforcement agency shall provide the individual,
the individual's attorney, or the individual's designated
representative with a copy of the signed written consent form
and retain a copy of each written consent form.
(c) Upon request, a law enforcement agency shall provide
the individual with reasonable access to a telephone and a
reasonable opportunity to consult with the individual's attorney
before any civil immigration interview; provided that juveniles
in law enforcement agency custody shall also have a reasonable
opportunity to contact a parent, guardian, or legal custodian.
(d) Law enforcement agencies shall log each civil
immigration interview request, including the following:
(1) Date and time of the civil immigration interview
request;
(2) Whether the written consent form under subsection (a)
was provided to the individual;
(3) The language used in the written consent form;
(4) Whether consent was given to a civil Immigration
interview;
(5) If consent was given, whether counsel was present at
the interview; and
2026-3285 HB1839 GDI HMSO 6

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) If consent was given, the date and time of the civil
immigration interview.
(e) Upon receiving any immigration hold, notification, or
transfer request from a federal immigration authority, a law
enforcement agency shall provide a copy of the request to the
individual and inform the individual whether the law enforcement
agency intends to comply with the request. If a law enforcement
agency provides a federal immigration authority with
notification that an individual is being, or will be, released
on a certain date,- the law enforcement agency shall promptly
provide the same notification in writing within two business
days to the individual and the individual's attorney or the
individual's designated representative.
(f) All records relating to a federal Immigration
authority's access to a detained individual provided by a law
enforcement agency, including all communication with the federal
immigration authority, shall be public records for purposes of
chapter 92F, and the exemptions provided in chapter 92F shall
not apply; provided that personal identifying information of a
detained individual shall be redacted before public disclosure
pursuant to section 92F-13(1). Records relating to federal
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO
■■luiiiiiHiniiiiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
immigration authority access to a detained individual shall
include but not be limited to;
(1) Logs maintained by the law enforcement agency pursuant
to subsection (d);
(2) The date the federal immigration authority was
provided the access; and
(3) Whether the federal immigration authority's access was
provided through an immigration hold^ notification
request, or transfer^ or other means.
(g) The department of the attorney general, the county
prosecuting attorneys, or an agency with separate enforcement
authority may receive and investigate complaints of violations
of this section and issue findings and corrective orders.
(h) Any person who is or was in custody and aggrieved by a
violation of this section may bring an action seeking injunctive
or declaratory relief and reasonable attorneys' fees against a
law enforcement agency that has violated the requirements of
subsection (a) or (b).
(i) For the purposes of this section:
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO 8

Page 9 1839
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
"Civil immigration interview" means any interview by
federal immigration authorities concerning civil immigration
matters of a person in the custody of a law enforcement agency.
"Federal immigration authority" means the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement^ the United States Customs
and Border Protection, or any other federal agency or component
authorized to conduct civil immigration enforcement or civil
immigration interviews under federal law.
"Immigration hold" means an immigration detainer issued
pursuant to title 8 Code of Federal Regulations section 287.7,
or any similar request from federal immigration authorities for
detention of an individual suspected of violating civil
immigration law.-
"Law enforcement agency" means any agency of the State or
any of its political subdivisions, or any officer or individual
of those agencies, that is authorized to enforce criminal laws;
operate correctional, detention, or juvenile detention
facilities; or maintain custody of individuals in correctional,
detention, or juvenile detention facilities. "Law enforcement
agency" does not include any federal agency or its political
subdivisions, or any officer or individual of those agencies."
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO

niiiiiinfliHiMiiiiiiii

Page 10
H.B. NO. --
I . . I ’I . g 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3285 HB1839 CDl HMSO 10
iniiiiiiiiiiimiiiiiiiiiiii

H.B. NO.
^^2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GO RNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1839, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
4^' —
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1839, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
187-26